Grinnell College
wallet;
Oldest College Newspaper West at the Mississippi
 
Vol. LXXIII
erinneli. Iowa. Friday, November 5,
“765 No. 8
 
Five Seniors Named as Phi sites;
Five Sophomores Get Book Award
Five Griiinell seniors were announced last night as newly
elected members of the Grinnell
chapter of Phi Beta happy, national contrary scholastic society.
Also announced were five sopho—
moves who will receive book
awards from the chapter for
general scholastic excellence in
their freshman year.
The five new Phi Beta Kappas,
first to be named from a senior
class suffering 235, are:
Karen robinson, majority
English.
Richard Edwards, majority in
economics.
James Holbrook, majority
philosophy.
John jersey, majority in psychology.
Christine Peterson, majority in
American studies.
Sophomores receiving ebook
awards are:
Ronald C o g s w e l1, Raymond
l-porn, Nancy finder, Roger May,
and Susan corner.
The membership centsﬁrates
and book awards were presented
at a special chapel program conducted by the Phi Beta happy
in
in
 
chapter president, Andrew cubic—
in (Spanish), assisted by the chapter secretary, James message
(English).
Speaker for the chapel was a
Phi Beta happy visiting scholar,
W. T. H. Jackson, Columbia universe y German professor and medievalist. His Subject was “joining Knights and Filthy hearts."
Special Supplement
In the longest issue of the
paper in over four years, the
aud; staff has prepared an
eightspage supplement in which
we focus on the slim conditions
of three Cities — Chicago, Des
points, and Grinnell. The supplement companies pages 5
through 12 of this week’s 5&3.
Two teams of photographers
and reporters spent the midsemester break in researchers
the stories for the supplement.
Special thanks go to Sue Taylor and Krys mexican for assistant in gathering information
in Chicago. Thanks also go to
our printers, who were kind
enough not to well at us.
 
Finally . . .
AFTER FAILING to get a picture at this century's brightest
comes at Council Bluffs recently, John Phillips struggled out
of bed at 5 am. last Sunday ta get this photograph of
lkeya-Seki just outside erronell-
spanish Schedules
Opening Concert
Jeanne-Marie cal-re, distinguished French spanish, will
open the 196565 Grinnell Concert
Series with a decimal in Roberts
Theatre at 8 pm, next Wednesday.
Admission will be by advance
reservation with activity ticket
only, reservations to be obtained
at the Fine Arts Center office between the hours of 10 and 12 or
2 and 4 o'clock today, Monday, or
Tuesday.
Miss large, who made her Paris
debut by performing all five Saint<
teens concerts in a single evening
and has since performed widely in
Europe, Africa, and the United
States, is professor of piano at
the National conservation in
Paris. She has been called
“France’s first lady of the keyboard, and very possibly the
world’s,"
her program will be all-Chopin
—the enhance Spianato and holocaust, 0p. 22; Twelve itunes;
wallace ND. 1 in G Minor, Op. 23;
and donate in B-flat Minor, 0p.
35.
Later events in this year’s concert. series will be: germany grey,
maritime, Jan. 23; the Riverside
Chamber fingers, March 11; and
the Minneapolis Symphony 0rchestra, April 30.
Need New Editor
Any student interested in the
position at editor of the l966
charles and Black sltould submit a letter of application to LaVerne turkey (biologY), chair.
man of the Board of sublime<
tions, by Monday, Nov. 15. Any
student who will be at Grinnell
at least through June 1957 )5
eligible The letter of applied<
tion should include the Candidate’s qualifications and his or
her idea or what sort of paper
the 5&3 should be. The new
editor will be elected Nov. 17
and will edit the Dec. 3 edition
of the 5&8 as a trial issue.
ever the past several weeks,
about fifteen Grinnell students
have begun to organize a diet
Nam Study Group, in a statement
of aims, committee organizing
said, “we. . .feel signsﬁcant implications can be draWn for the
social role of serious interventions
everywhere, including here at
issue, diet Nam.
“while the faculty panel discussion and the teacher last spring
were significant and valuable con
traditions, we feel that a more
disciplines and r i g or ou s approach to the issues from varying
frames of reference might lead
to greater understanding of the
problem, as well as raise the minor
of political commentary to a new
level of responsibilityK legitimate
and lane.”
Specifically, the group will split
up into three smaller study
groups, called international Sys
temp, Social Change and Economic Development, and Revolution»
are airfare. Faculty members
serving on the International Systems study group are: Charles
cleaner (English), Richard centers (assistant dean), Alan Jones
(history), Raymond Beth (his.
tony), and Joseph mail (history).
Bill Barnes is the student chairman of this committee.
Serving as faculty sponsors on
the Social Change and Economic
Development committee are: Roger Eldridge (college chaplain),
Robert Voertman, (economics),
kirk Eaay (German), and Kenneth christianity (biology). pic
classes is student chairman.
On the Revolutionary airfare
committee, faculty sponsors are:
James pages (political science),
Ronald Kurtz (sociology and an«
thropolOgy), red Donohoe (speech
and theater), Harold Fletcher (p0<
optical science), and Edward
Wright (philosophy and religion).
The student chairman is Bill Gren—
zebach.
 
diet Nam Study Group
Established On (a
put
Each of these steering committees has set up its oWn program
and arranged meetings.
A publicity campaign aimed at
developing student interest and
participation in the program will
be conducted in the next several
days, The next meeting or each
of the three committees will be
open to all interested students
and will mark the beginning or
the study process, The Social
Change and Economic Develop
ment committee will meet
Wednesday, Nov. 17 at 7:30 p.rrp
in the Religious Activities Room.
The international Systems will
meet Tuesday, Nov. 9 in the semi.
car room in nursing basement at
8 pm. and the committee studying revolutionary welfare will
meet Wednesday, Nov. lo at 8
pm. in the Religious Activities
Room.
Each study will drive into its
respective area for s e v e r a1
months, meeting bi-weekly, then
organize its findings and present
an oral panel report on the first
day of a conference to be held as
the combination of the program in
February or March. State Department representatiiies as well
as other interested lntellectuall
will be invited to participate in
the conference. The conference is
intended to integrate the conclusions of the study groups into an
evaluation of United States foreign
policy in diet Nam.
Summarizing the importance of
the study group in terms of the
current intellectual atmosphere of
the college, the organizing of.the
group said, “This kind of platform obviously grows out of A
restivenessv and dissatisfaction
with the kind of discussion (or
lack of it) that goes on at. trim
well. We feel that an attempt
should be made to raise the Grinnell community from relative intellectual apache to relative interesting minor and responsibility.
 
Bernard jefferson, father of a
Grinnell graduate and a current
student, presented a slide and lecr
sure program of tile Soviet Union
Monday in the gui'line Library
Viewing Room. jefferson spent a
month in the USSR last summer
 
 
Gates lectures, John Smith, from Yale
proposed to Raise ’The Problem of God’
John admin Smith, professor of
philosophy and chairman of the
department of philosophy at Yale
University, will deliver the 1965
Gates Memorial Lectures at triple
well Nov. 1416.
He will give three public lectures, all in service chapel, on the
theme “The Problem of God.” The
schedule:
Nov. 14, 8 pm. — “The Biblical
Approach"
Nov. 15, 8 pm. — “The substantial Approach.”
Nov 16, ll a.m, —
physical Approach.”
A specialist bit American philosophy and the philosophy of religion,
“The Meta-
 
Smith received his BA. and PhD.
degrees from Columbia University
and 8 ED. degree from Union
theoretical seminars.
Dr. Smith has been a member
of the Yale [equity since 1952, and
before that was on the societies of
nascar College, harvard College,
and Columbia University.
He was Dudleian lectures for
1960 at Harvard University, was
Suarez lectures for 1963 at abraham University, and has also
taught at Union theoretical seminars and at the University or
Michigan,
He is the author of several leading books and articles. including
 
“The Spirit of American Philos»
ophy” and “Reason and God."
jefferson Presents Slides of Russia,
Finds People There Friendly, precious
at the invitation of the soviet got<
element, as a member of the
American Photographic Society.
During this time he took some
2,ooo slides, some of which were
shown to the college audience.
jefferson’s Slides focused ups
the Soviet people, and shows
them going about their everyday
lives. He found the “people in
Russia Very friendly and precious." However, under Soviet law,
one must obtain permission from
a person in order to photograph
him. jefferson found that ballpoint pens and showing guy made
this law an easy one With which
ADDRESS HERE:
 
pig. Two
SCARLET AND BLACK
 
Guaranteed Fees
On the agenda for this weekend’s meeting of the
Board of Trustees is consideration of a student fee increase for next year.
We would like to say some things about fees and
the sentence of college administrators to raise them.
, Average tuition at 99 selected private institutions,
according to the American Council on Education's Fact
Book, is somewhat over $1,200 (Grinnell’s is $1,640).
The U.S. Office of Education reports that the average
‘cost of room and board is $700 (Grinnell’s is $850),
The USOE also notes that incidental costs of transportation, clothing, textbooks, and recreation run between
$500 and $1,000. (Grinnell’s official incidental fees —
health, activities, and admissions fees —« run to $110;
you can make your own estimate on personal expenses.)
Grinnell’s trustees have pushed the comprehensive
fee to its present $2,600 level by small pumps since 1957,
when the fee was $1,550. These increases, which have
become an annual autumn tradition at Grinnell, have
the effect of making the four-year cost of a Grinnell
education about $1,000 more than could be anticipated
in a student‘s college-planning days.
' Fee increases are unpleasant but necessary, the
dministrators tells us. ”Institutions of higher learning are subject to three principle forces making for
l necessary increase in operating cost. Increasing instruments, the need for higher faculty salaries, and
necessary instructional improvements are demands
.which cannon be ignored," an Ohio university administrator pointed out earlier this year at the National Conference on Higher Education.
But the problems of yearly fee increases can’t be
ignored, either. One trouble with fee increases is that
scholarships area’t raised commensurately. And even
f that $100 or $150 increase can be observed by more
money from home, it just inn’t good public relations.
So we would like to suggest that the trustees seriously consider the plan, now in effect at St. Olaf Col-
age, thereby students contract with the college on
.What their tuition will be for four years. This plan allows students to estimate their college expenses accurately and projects the school against large numbers
of transferring students in the final two years.
We might further suggest that Grinnell students
be allowed to contract for their entire comprehensive
fee to guard against room, board, and incidental fee increases which would make a guaranteed tuition an
empty sales feature,
A guaranteed comprehensive fee is, very simply,‘
a good idea.
 
Response to Response in Poetic Form
To the Editor:
In response to the response to “Lyric Doggeral (sic) Number
One" (1 just related it):
Dear George eastern (Education):
1 suspended, solely and deliberately.
To paraphrase:
it air‘t what you say, it's the way that you say it.
i grave not the old familiar ideas.
But that there he posted,
Along the railroad track,
A sign
heading 7 train 1m to right —
English Spoken Here. A St. Louisan
inarentl
charles and Black
GIINNELI. COLLEGE
Grinnell. town
A weekly ‘psp oi published early similar ol me legs year’ by meet communities on Student Pub
(sons. acprcscnicn 1m national advertising by National Ad-
\‘L‘l'KIsmg Service. inn, colegc publishers Representative,
is lziisi ioih sucks, New York 21, N.r, Second cuts posting paid ii council, Iowa Subscription mo 55.00 per
school \can “500 paid subscriptions.
ciinyiigni was Si is: and such
 
RDHOR .
lusmcss MANAGER
AonUClAIL EDH'OR ,
scores CDIIOR
iuiuouu LDH‘OR
ClucuLAuoN MANA . w.
u or LlllCAGO BUREAU . , . . SHE Taylor
[limits in 51 zus, on nmsn. Steve calendar
s , , Aiiin ireland, Juulze Bah], Sue Buqulht, Marlhl jersey,
Pull funky, him clay. Anne run, Jeff Nerf.
uni lone, .loiincno roll, buy Mllcom, sue Mozslue,
I women .v-iici round, :lexnoi Plln, Judy Scan.
simon lVllyne Menu], Sue Banner. chi Chad!
, , heavy limoii, minor. wzuml
umn numbers, Susan wm
.colin won
level run-a
. low Homemsim cum
cynihl- anime
Chindler Muniuiun
STAD‘F
ss si'ur
 
and place typically
Wilbur links
Friday, November I. IN!
links' Journal
This is my first entry, I have been keeping this
journal, as i suppose almost everyone has, without
ever having written anything, submitting instead
the cellular matter of perception and reflection to
collect itself and settle into the back of my brain as
a kind of nutritional embryo. I might wait for this
child to develop unconsciously and of itself and be
born, holiday, into wisdom of word or need or both.
but I fear decision: the hidden transformation of
that waiting into a main remembering, into a subtle
computing attempt to ﬁx the point in time that the
pregnancy was observed. For perhaps that cellular
matter, unexpressed, is only that — referral waste,
Rather than allow the issue of my experience to he
lion an orphan or in die through my own carelessness or clearance, I have resolVEd to work feeling
into thought, to parent the infant, if he exists, by
communication him.
Our genius estates us. tennis is that thought
which goes on continuously and by itself, like direction, and is exposed only in those sleeping moments
when we are not thinking: while we are breaking
our teeth, for example, or thing our shoes, or falling
asleep in the shower. It is then that we least expect.
the phenomenon of insight, so that it parts back
into the chicken before we realize that we are centers. We are left variety troubled, feeling that something has eluded us, that we have been visited by a
certainly which we cannon identity. A remains oi
last night’s forgotten dream, we might think. A: the
noise or the sub-vocal soliloquy called thinking is resumes, the event seems to lose significance; the insight is observed the instant we engage our minds
in its pursuit.
The genius is able to think without talking to himself. His references annihilate themselves, existing
the proposed silence that was their source. We cannon discover the knowledge available to him either
by “sitting down" or “going out" to search for it,
because we are ourselves that knowledge, and in<
separated from it. it things to us like the ocean to
the hull of a boat that ﬂcats upon it. It cannon be
granted, as a hand cannon grass itself; it cannon be
expressed, as a word cannon define itself. Yet it recipes and operates in us at every moment, peterson-
David Lighlbourne
ing that we do what we need to do, whether or not
we know what those needs are. We can communicate
these corporate instances only by demonstration
them, by responding spontaneously and automatically
to their impulses. But we are only ordinary rentals:
our references compound our intention and correct
our responses. Thus our communication will be, at
best, important
Inspired by'a military ten minutes in a halfv
happened charles and Black office, a nostalgia for
the colleague shirtsleeve and green visit, and a desire to participate in the patent disorder of reporting
these adolescent days, this journal will be an im—
perfect attempt to iii-rest and surround the occasions1 insights that visit me. It may be necessary for me
to do a lot or tooth-breaking and shoe-thing and
shower-sleeping in order to gel material; but I urge
the reader to make references. to consider its execution and the implications of its existence as well as
its subject matter. If the journal fails as s piece at
writing, it will yet unwittingly demonstrate certain
facts about its author, who claims to represent a (dimension of the student mind that is somewhat
reflected in these pages. l begin with the assume»
tion that the intellectual and spiritual matters which
concern me cannon be beautifully unlike those which
concern all of us; we are, after all, members of the
same generation and of the same community.
New I am writing it all down, and it seems that
whatever is written ought to be read, When it appears in print, 1 shall certainly read it, with the
vanity of one who cannon take his eyes from a
photograph of himself. But I shall not be the actress
impersonator that we encounter in our own photographs, but simply anonymous, to those who know
me and even, maybe, to myself. For this journal
will not record those external features that dis»
tinguish me from other individuals, but will receive
reflections and beliefs, the internal features that are
hidden in the particular silence of each of us, It is
perhaps this silence that I wish to celebrate, to overcome by example the isolation of appliances. I am
satisfying ii special need and doing, I feel, what
many people would like lo do. Maybe everyone
should have ii newspaper column.
WILBUR JENKS
trains and rivers
I've been asked to say something by way of in»
transaction about Son House, the metro blues singer,
prior to his performance here tomorrow night, and
don't know exactly where to begin.
For one thing, Son House is one of an older generations oi metro country blues artists who were born
in the Mississippi ”Delta" region. recorded a few
“race records" in the 20's and 30's, and then discs—
placed back into the break obscurity oi the nonhem
Mississippi Countryside. And unlike many of the rediscovered country performing currently singing [0
the college folk “removal,” Son House is “pure Delta,"
which means he helped intent and develop some of
[he most painting, driven, better and psychologicallylnlense music in Western culture. From Charlie
button, Son House and Willie Brown through Robert
Johnson to buddy Waters, and John Lee looked,
the Delta Style is the "mainstream" in country
blues, the central point of influence for every other
kind of “blues" muSlC from hillbilly to sophisticated
jazz to rock-and-roll. IL is also, according to Newsweek, “our finest native-born music,”
The original metro blues were concerned —
somewhere, at some time ~ as an extension of group
music into 3 [arm in which the individual Singer
could improving freely around some introspective,
personal theme. The metaphor “the blues” has come
to be associated with many things, but it originally
meant die total injection and allocation from society
is» by the rural Southern metro, experienced in the
marsh, practical terms of his daily existence. An i
sense environment was bound lo produce intense i
divisions, and it was the illiterate artists in this outcome society, the fingers and undefined country
gnilanplayeis, ivliu capital this intensity in its most
brilliant and hallucinatory form.
The creative blues artist had to have the poet’s
outlook — “the ab' ' m state the trucks of his time
he cum of, Son House is thus
the music of poverty, evaluating labor, the fears oi
the Mississippi metro under the lunch-law modern
ment of the 20's and 30's, as well as the loves and
headlines of an excellent sensitive to a Dostoyevskian
predictions. On another level it is the music of a
arabic vision trying to cope with the particular: or its
destiny.
There are, of Course, many factors which make
this kind of cultural event inaccessible to a white
audience. Country blues performing were other she,
discovered poet-guitar players, and regardless or
individual possibilities the country blues are most
often intimate soliloquies, painful admissions in a
private dialogue between the artist's emotional and
artistic possibilities. The best blues performances
are always improvised and spontaneous, the singer
choosing his theme and actually putting the song 10‘
gather on the spot, relying on his own incentive
abilities and falling back if necessary on the thousands oi stanley and phrases which are “commonwealth" in blues lyrics. Then too, marsh voice, thick
accent, and a promotion and unpolished musical style
add to the problems bl a iii-may presentation.
All too often there is a sentence to discuss this
metro music as an charitable, but nevertheless unpleasant reminder of what this country has done to
its colored citizens. This kind of attitude is double
gratuitous in that it ignored the artistic excellence
of these metro fingers at the same time that. it
classes them off in hlswry us the opportunity Vic—
time of a regrettable cultural law. The truth of the
matter is that the American South created the circumstances (or a remarkable variety at man, of
man driven to the physical and psychological holders of human insurance, and that from this remarkable, historical dosage this manner of man
brought back a new version of human experience,
and was forced to intent — out of lllltel'any Ind lg:
romance ——a new kind oi human art. that mu,
capable of telling about me terror of that trip.
 
pridsyjue’vnhlser 5. loss .
scanner AND BLACK
cargo Thrao
 
Drama, Music, Movie and Melodrama
On Social Calendar for This Weekend
Social outlook for the Weekend:
drama, music, and melodrama.
Special feature is the two performances of In White America, at
6:00 and 9:30 tomorrow evening,
in Roberts Theatre,
Also scheduled on tomorrow‘s
calendar is an Esperanto few-
during Son House,
Delta blues singer.
Movie sons can view require
for a lightweight tonight at 8:00
and/or tomorrow at 10:00.
Sunday offers a xerox concert
at 4:00 in the South Lounge, and
the first performance of Total
Theatre in the Arena at 8:09.
Mississippi
 
The
ENGAGE-ABLES
'O
.L
run n... his t. inn- lamp mines
is 51m Inuqﬂnu-ll. 9 man... m.
Each Keepsake setting is
a marketplace of design, re- _
sleeping the full compliance
and beauty of the center diamond . . . a perfect gem of
ﬂaccess clarity, ﬁne color and
meticulous modern cut. The
name, Keepsake, in the ring
and on the tag is your assurance of fine quality.
Your very personal Keepsake
is now at .your Keepsake
Jawelsr’s store. Find him in
the yellow pages under
,“develops.”
l— Doug McCormac
Charlie Wu had his revenues As I dizzily stated
(Continued from last issue.
at my buttonless shirts, I asked the homeless China<
man. “What happened?"
“So holly," he singles, "Wild mongolia ﬂy in
‘window and water, water, chinese they were seed."
He guilawedr
“congress don’t even fly, you lazy punk,” I
started. “And each button Will cost you five more
pounds of free laundry." Now, it was my turn to
single.
“[ figure you one me 150 pounds of free laundry,
and ii 1 don’t get quickly service. I’ll have a court
inspection on you before you can say, ‘sao use
lung.’ ”
Charlie was impressed, and so were my friends
when I offered to have their laundry done for free.
They were not very impressed when all their shirts
came back without buttons. however.
But when I explained that for every button lost
live new pounds oi counseling were gained, everyone
immediately shared my enthusiasm for such a good
deal.
At an average of 9 buttons per shirt and 20 shirts
per bag (we soon quit having extraneous apparel
such as underwear washer, since there was nothing
to he gained from anything but shirts), each bag
meant 900 more pounds or tree counseling
Within three weeks, all my acquaintances and
their acquaintances were having their shirts done
tree, for Charlie now owen me 73,745 pounds, and
the number was increasing every minute as he
washer and then vengefully derbuttoned shirt after
shirt.
bridge Pot
Newspapers soon picked up the story, and people
on the street began to offer me the Shirts all their
banks. Young ladies listening to work in only bras
stores were not uncommon, for few people could
allows to miss five free pounds of counseling.
Charlie Wu’s business was looking so kansas
totally, in fact, that he had bought out all the other
countries in Chicago to keep pace with the demand.
He reader huge profits hy resulting the cut-oil but<
tons (just as 1 sold the buttonless shirts) to shirt
manufacturers for ridiculously inﬂaged prices. Such
was the demand for shirts for de-beginning.
Then, one day, the whole thing blow up in my
face. My ﬂget of seems had picked up their daily
load oi bottomless shirts, when 1 opened the bags and
discovered all the Shirts in stress, topless for result.
I returned interested to Charlie Wu's and met
the charitable Chinaman.
“So solid,” he singles again, and i knew the show
was over. “You notice each button still on shirt. Very
careful, this time. So solid hour nasty tips, but no
free laundry for pilot. No free laundry for dirty her
man fastest.”
The stock market crash of 1925 was like a truck
driver’s formatting to leave a tip in comparison with
the results oi the Chlilaman's iiendish frank. Every«
one wanted their shirts back. but only tags were ieit.
I sold range on street corners and more tags eV<
anywhere. Girls no longer walked only in brassieres,
and the high necklace was in value. Charlie Wu left
from the top of the Tribune Tower, streaming,
“Dirty capitalist!"
Tragedy filled the air like sort in a steel town,
and the homeless Chinaman only watched,
 
 
HOW TO PLAN YOUR ENGAGEMENT'AND WEDDING
areas: send new ZO-pcgu booking, ”How To Plan your Engagement
and Wedding” and new lZ-pnua full color folder, both for only 25'.
Also, send special utlcr of beautiful 44-min: Erldl'l Book.
Nam
Addict
I CW
note—Zip
KEEPSAKE DlAMOND RINGS, SYRACUSE, NEW Y_0RK,13202
KRAMER JEWELRY
Your Keepsot ke Dealer
40h 8r Broad
 
Poverty Grant Killed'in While America' Here Tomorrow
A lﬁregular approximately from
student act' es for the Des
holmes Project was rejected
Wednesday evening by the student
senate.
Tile proposal was made at the
previous meeting by liable Hall
which admitted 15 dollars to the
project from hall funds. directions to the senate allocation were
that the project has political ringtones, inasmuch as it represents
a political action: that the project
is not supported by the general
consensus of Grinlleil student
opinion; and that the project is
not an appropriate activity on
which to spend student funds intended for social activities.
"In ’White America," which
will play two performances here
tomorrow, Is a collection of historical documents, skillfully nov-
en together by a good, unobtrue
site narrative by Martin B. suburban, an assistant professor
’oi history at Princeton
xerox Concert
Bartok's ,quarter .No. 2 .and
Brohms’ quarter in A Minor, 0p.
51, No. 2, will be performed by
the xerox quarter this Sunday at
4 p.111. in the South Lounge of the
Forum,
 
Whom: the moon hits
your eye like a biga
pizza pie.
that's nirvana's.
Oh well . . . we tried anchor.
"AH "n
nirvana's Pizza
236-6221
Free Delivery
it tracks the development of
American race relations from 1715
to the present. It exposed the extent of our novelty toward thou
metro in the North and the South under players and emancipation.
The KKK and the; President's ac
tions add up to the American
shame or decent and hypocrisy on
the whole question of racial differences. '
The cast is composed of six
actors—three degrees and three
writes. A guitarist accompanied
and occasionally joins‘ in on the
songs which interactive the harry—
time.
“There are dramatic moments,
and funny, engaging, deﬁant and
quiet ones. i don’t see how anything could have made this story
more electrical or more moving,"
.said smith Oliver of the New
worker on the New York show
For School -or
Typewriter
Supplies
Grinnell
Office Supply
Across from the Postoffico
GRINNELL. IOWA
 
 
Page Four
SCARLET AND BLACK
Knox-plymouth finally inspired thanks
By PAUL BRADLEY
For the last month the driver5in of Rochester has been having
security problems. In October such
incidents as an attempted rape, a
town and down ﬁget, and fraternity quarters were not presented
or even broken up by the college
fingering.
M I result of these and other
[domains the school is now plan—
lips to double its force oi Pinkertm guards on patrol at night, has
appointed a permanent group of
counters to function at probability
parties, has decided to ban beer
plants, and fixed that only guests
can attend fraternity parties.
tie»:
Two processors at M.I.T. have
refused to sign paths of royalty to
the Constitution of the United
States and Massachusetts They
impose the Massachusetts state
law requiring all applicants for
teaching position to sign such an
path.
They an new collecting funds to
take the case to the Massachusetts
State Superior Court where they
hope the paths will be declared unconstitutional. The processors claim
the state should not disciplinary
between teaching and other pro-
sessions.
it u u
Every year, the week before the
annual football game between
arch-rivers Knox and plymouth is
ﬁlled with all sorts of thanks. This
year Knox made a special effort
in that direction,
On the Wednesday before the big
battle, the Bronze Turkey. the
trophy given to the winner at the
annual classic. was stolen from
Monrnouth’s trophy case. No reservation took place the next day.
Friday morning a Knox rock
edition of the plymouth Oracle
was delivered to plymouth students. The false Oracle was printed
on the back of that week's Knox
Student and was closer enough to
fool many. That afternoon plymouth made up a fake Student
and delivered it to Knox students.
Knox restricted with a rain of turkey teachers nn the plymouth
football field where the game was
to be played the next day.
Finally the big game took place,
the ministers heating the scott
14-6.
 
 
Van rachel Motor Sales
Your Oldsmohile Dealer in Grinnell
 
How to make a snap course
out of a
tough one!
Obviously, Old: 4-4-2 claimed for its ﬁnals. It masters miles with a 400-cubic7inch V-B,
Alt-barrel carb and a gambling pair of pipes. tools corners with heavy-duty suspension
and front and rear liabilities. Goes to the head of its class with the apartment conﬁduration
ever to top four red-line tires. All this, and straight A’s in economics, too. . .
LOOK TO OLDS FOR THE NEWl
like matching its models price to your pocket!
 
Friday. November 5. i965
Committee Plans
Inaugural Events
President Glenn suggest has
established a 13»man committee In
plan the programs for inaugural.
tion Week, April ll through 17.
The week of activities will b.
animated by the official inaugura—
tion of Dr. suggest as Grinnell’l
rights president on Sunday, April
17‘
Committee members include:
Evelyn circuit (English), scum
Gooobrod (music). Richard How: (invite).
canyon Knopf (economics). camel see.
ton thisiory). Josevn Wall iiiisiotit. “a
Sheldon Zitntr (English), «pray-m
the faculty:
Keith ring, representing the student};
rrcd less (public Mar
Jones (alumni secretary). permits Ludwi
(vice vrcsldull). and julie: clause (tie:
oi the cniisgii, ex~oiiicio members representing the administration.
The committee is being changed
by Guillermo vendors (biology).
college martial.
In accounting the computer, Dr.
suggest asked that events such as
symposia, colloquia, concerts, and
exhibitions be included In the
week's activities.
Dr. suggest added, “I am sure
you will agree with run that in (determined the reliability of inaugurni programs, we should put
heavy consideration on their academic or artistic value."
ielnnonl).
Brass Rubbings Now
In Sheafier Gallery
A collection of 29 English brass
r u b b l n g S Will be estimated in
Scheaffer Gallery Oct. 27-Nov. 15.
documented classes are n (a.
miller feature on hundreds 0i British churches. They are collaborative, and take the term oi infrared figures representing a
wide variety of classes and proceedings.
Al'physically, styles range from
reﬁnew and sophisticated to russia
and promotion. The dealt at their
quality and beauty was reached
in the 14th century. .
Brass rankings are obtained by
placing mapér over the brass, at.
filing it in place with marking
tape. and running the paper with
a dragon-like material called heelball. a very hard non-speak'ﬂbee
Substance made of lamp black,
beeswax and yellow.
Selected from the collection of
Di‘. and Mrs. Max Sch-(letter of
Tucson, Ariz.. the exhibition was
organized by the Tucson All men<
her and is being calculated bv the
Association of Western Alt Museurns.
GLASSES
Made and impaired
in Our Laboratory
Contact Lenses
Cases and
Solutions
 
Eyes
Examined
Phone 236-3‘979
E. J.lenses, OD.
OPTOMETRIST
Across from Post Office
Closed hours. PM.
and Soil PM,
. l
 
Friday. November 5. ms
SCARLET AND BLACK
Page Fin
 
View Poverty
Des ﬁunions doctors direct Shows
viiiﬂy @f life Beneath The Edit?!
By JOHN WOLF
JEAN VANDERVOORT
JOHN PHILLIPS
We went to Des points last Friday not knowing too much about
poverty conditions in Iowa’s cape»
tax. other than the {act that there
were major “models” areas.
The southeast “doctors" area
was mh‘ immediate target. This
section lies about a mile from the
truly golden capitol dome, which
THE FIRST WOMAN we walked to
is a prominent feature to the north
ol‘ the clubs, In theory, this is the
worst slim area, and for some
reason has so far been passed up
in Des points' urban renewal
plans.
The residents of the district are
well integrated—7o per cent white.
25 per cent metro, and 5 per cent
Mexican. They area't created,
either; the area has a rural, almost appearing (at least on a
warm fall day), appearance it you
ignore certain unpleasant aspects.
our approach to learning about
the doctors area was [0 wall’
conspicuously and gruboily
tlii-o gh the streets find to look
for people who might be willing
to talk to three obviol out there.
t~ t proved unexpectedly
l, and 0111' first contact
'llc an old Mexican woman
Whﬂ had lived l'Cl’ 1.0 years in the
house from which she emerald to
l‘ .
She spoke poor English, but she
was glad to answer our questions.
"All my children were born and
wet: married in this house. NOW
both boys are disorder," She said
without much concern.
Bath her daughters lived up the
bl .i. Her daughters' children ap—
. entry were among the old ladies treasures in life. she had
Halloween generations, made bit
school by her grandchildren, posted
on the windows of her home —
probably among the beslrkept
houses in the neighborhood.
 
The neighborhood on a whole is
quite unlike the pleasant houses
that surround our college. About
90 per cent of the homes don't
have complete plumbing facilities.
Consequently, initiatives, and decrease ones at that, add their una
painted and ramshackle experiences to an area that otherwise
is sufficiently draw and run down.
Many of the streets remain usr
saved, Yards are generally filled
with grass and needs which grow
had lived in the same
doctors—area house since coming to Des Molnex from
Mexico 40 years age.
over broken machinery and other
junk scattered through the area.
But the old Mexican woman
didn't complete about her conditions. In fact, she claimed, "1 am
happy." Happy despite her liability to communicate easily With
her neighbors, who included see
gross, italiano, and a group which
the woman simply called “Amen
icons." No one nearby spoke her
native Spanish, not
daughters. _
Her activities convicted of going
to church once a wcclt, going
downtown occasionally to eat at a
directory, and visiting her husA
band's get a. With little more
than a since oi brief, she said,
“The cemetery is my life."
Her husband had worked in the'
nearbytmilroad freight yards. She
now lived on social security and
other benefits.
The railroads provide employ;
ment for a number 0! the doctors
residents. There are manufacturing concerns and some packing
houses on the southeast part of
A FACTORY that males
night bags wanted the pipe
party of this old metro
women. She thinks she will
well but dress't know where
she will move.
even her '
 
town to keep nearly everyone in
the area employed. Unemplaye
ment dress't seem to be at the
base or Des holmes' poverty. Des
points seems able to provide
each citizen ivtth a job, btit the
city can'[ follow tip that achieve
ment with commensurate living
conditions.
As we were about to leave, the
lady rendered why they didn’t fix
the place tip. and she pointed to
the updated streets and two and
cieni houses that were filing a
part across the street. She thought
maybe the area was being reserved for a factory lifetime in
the future. Why have the streets
if you’re gomg to build a factory?
.Illlllllllllllllllllllllllllilllllll:llllllllltliillllllllllllllllllllltllllllillllllllllllllll
Lives in House
Behind Factory
illllllllllllllilllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllIIIIlllllllllllllllilllllllliilllilllll
We rendered toward a factory
that makes the little travel bags
you get from some airlines. Just
behind the plant we saw an old
metro woman working in her yard
which was the site or a typical
area hnmckadded to placement
over the years. erratically painted, glasses in with plastic sheets,
and just not possession the unified quality generally associated
With a house.
The woman disappeared inside
before we got to the house, so we
went to the back door and
blocked. In the back was a pump,
on Outhouse, and a small cool
for checking.
The woman, dressed in penis
generally and a wide»printed hat,
answered our knock and talked
rettccntly for awhile from behind
her screen door, and then stopped
outside to answer our queries.
The woman surprised us when
she noted that she was 72 years
old. She had lived on the property
she now occupied (or 35 years,
she said.
 
 
ii has values, Chicago, private
 
The IOWA CAPITOL is only a mile away train the not,
gains district, where you can ﬁnd wooden areas — and
ouihnuses near home: without plumbing.
Now, however, her property had
become desirable. The flight-bag
factory wanted it for expansion,
“and ii they other me enough I'll
let them have it."
She didn‘t have any idea where
she would move II she sold her
land, but she said he had lots
of relatives on the west side of
Des points.
Her parents came from Virgin»
la, but she was born in Iowa.
Her family moved to Des points
in 1917, and her father started the
Cafeteria in the IDwa plate House.
We were impressed by her intelligence and again were stirprised to learn she had gotten no
further In her formal education
than one semester at East High
School ln Des MDines. Still, she
knew a lot about the natural history and geology of the area and
was well acquainted with the op
emotions of the flightrbag factory.
The old metro woman made a
little money from her checking, but
her main support was from her
late husband‘s pension; he had
worked at the Burlington Railroad
roundsﬂuse.
We asked her if she got water
from the pump in h - yard. “The
pump dress't for was her reply. “A neighbor up the road
brings me water. I use rain water
—sort materials doing dishes.
Otherwise 1 only use about a buck.
or a week."
She was very proud oi the fact
that in her immediate family
“eight boys are in the service, and
we have five or siX_ nurses. I
don‘t know about the sixth one
because she’s only three months
old." '
We walked several blocks and
(Continued on Page ii)
 
Page Six
SCARLET AND ELACK
1» 01d People Don't Complain About Situation
.‘(mi red from Preceding Page)
1311' across a house that was
strikingiy ramshackle even among
the seller windows games. All Old
man who might well he the pubs
just oi some future an poverty
poster via sitting in front of the
house, which was being overgrown
wuh grass and weed
problems. with a budget address
than $40,000 a year (supplied by
the United Campaign), only two
Sam gives me $100 a month” kids " We asked them wet'lt could iu11»time workers can be hired,
Not really enough to live on, we be done to help the situation ‘Its “but we new at least may we
noted.
As we left Mr. genes, the three
of us were struck by the knowledge that the three old people we
had talked to so far had not complaints about the conditions they
were living in. They were doing
got to start team the lientt. New
buildings want solve the piuh
lean A nice soltitioul
As we were leaving, we passed
a home next to the church. A india
and his son were standing in front
of the house, find the father com-
MR. VEACH site in front of his low-year-old house in nice weather. He has two cats and
an occasional reporter for company.
Mr. beach was the man‘s name,
and he was 30 years old. His left
were bad, so he didn’t, move a»
round much. “I just sit out here
in the nice weather, and when I
get hungry I go in to get some
thing to eat.”
His wife had died a few months
ago, so “I‘m the last one to live
THIS WOMAN'S HUSBAND
~in this house. It's 100 years old.”
We all believed him about the age
or the house, but actually he
wash‘t alone. He kept two cats to
catch rats.
Mr. beach had lived in the house
for 25 years. He had been an un—
(let-taken in St. Louis and Kansas
City nciortt relating. ‘Now Uncle
the best they could do alone to
live out their days happens, We
supposed they were happy. We
Could hardly believe they were
proud, though.
A couple blocks from the century-old houston Mr. beach, we
saw a group painting an old
church. the sheltering Rock Pen-
is employed. but the teach.
iicn of their property makes you wonder if he inn‘t under.
employed.
tacostal Church. The persons doing the painting were members of
the tamilypt the church’s minister.
We asked them it they lived in
the neighborhood. They didn’t. We
asked them what kind of people
lived in the doctors area. “easily people with dcbto._ dog-i and
 
planned, “Now I suppose I’ll have
to go out and get a salmon oi
white paint and paint my fence.
Can’t have a dirty hence next tn
a nice white church.” somehow
the man’s statement didn’t seem
[0 come from the heart.
We came across a big red brick
building in the middle of the Bat»
toys area and learned that it was
the “oldest settlement house west
of the mississippi.” It had been
founded in 1895 by a followed al
J1me Addams. When lt was estate
limited it was already in a slim
area, and it has remained a slim
are:
'illllllillllllll
iii 1‘ “P “ei- am-
in one.
' ﬁt
within keep
Illlll1111111llllllllllllilllllllllllllllllllllll1111111llllllllllllllllllllllllllllll'llllllll
We talked at length with one
of the two illllrtlmB workers at the
Roadside Settlement House. He
was a metro, originally trout Ins
dial, who had taken the job at
Roadside after graduation train
brake University.
He informed us that Roadside
lllllllllllililllllllillllllllilllllltllllllll'
served the entire southeast not- ‘
toys area—about a one square
mile area and 3,000 population. He
said that 80 per cent at the housing in the doctors district was
distributed.
“There are over 500 living sql‘uc»
but-es here, and only 40 have complete plumbingtaoillties," he said.
,Roadsidp wan having in own
 
young metro iinrcd. To add [0
Roadside s ti ouhln its gyiu guilty
ing had been turned out in October.
Tile scltlemeiit house directors.
he said, are trying to get the city
to make such basic improve
our FRIEND PUNK is at the
right of the picture below.
Other members at Punk's
family pose for John Phillips
before getting on with the
chorus of moving.
 
 
 
 
Eriasy..Ne_member s, not}
meets as saying water maria {or
plumbing. having streets to rat
plate the posted micro roads, and
installing adequate street lighting
to discounted crime. 50 tax
they’ve only had luck With the
street lighting requests.
Roadside IS one at five settlement houses in DES movies 'lite
other {our dl‘e located in male
sirzlble areas.
Mother oi Font
Willing to merit
llllllililllllllllillll‘lllllll’:
.lllllllll=lillllllillllllllllllllltllllllllllllllllillllllllllllllllltlllllltllllllllllllllllli
We next sought out a family
group, and we were not surprised
to iiurl the younger people in this
area resistant to talk. We did into
one woman who was the mother
of tour children and who was
Willing to tail: to us. Her family
had moved to Des movies seven
years ago from convertible. Her
husband worked at the J. C. White
Company. They owned their mm
house and had running water. The
womztu and her children were
dressed quite well. Only the com
action at their home seemed out
or place. lt had the typical pieces.
together, appointed, plastlccwiiiclawed look of the other homes
in the area. And the yard tips
filled with yuiilr. Des .stories would
include the head or (1 family on
the list oi employed. lots aiiiazmg
how you can make data look as
you want them to look.
As we were leaving for the day,
we noticed a little boy watching
us. He indicated by holding up
llngEI‘s that he was four years old.
His name, we learned later, was
“Punk.” We rendered what his
rather did. “Nothing," said Punk.
Why? we rendered. “He got shot
in the hand."
When we returned Saturday
morning, we went ﬁrss to the
house where Punk said he lived.
Punk and some other children
were being watched by B younger
~ «A W _
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
VNovomhr I. I96!
SCARLET AND BLACK
 
>‘S‘even Children in One House
woman who said that the family
was in the process of not/mg.
The better ot the family worked,
or had worked until the shooting
accident, in a rnanutacturing plant
on the south Side. The family lived
in a barracksrlike, one~story building, which, as was dutch the case,
had no larry around it and was
badly in need at paint. Nine people, including seven children, lived
in the house. Maybe their new
house would be better. You can
always hope.
We met another friendly boy
that day in the doctors. His name
was Paul and he lived in a house
that had two trucks ﬁlled with old
washing machines, tires, and assisted junk in the trout yard.
Paul was friendly and wanted to
talk to us. But we were out of
luck. and Paul’s mother ordered a
retreat into their home. We liked
call],
We almost missed the last per
son we talked to. Site was sitting
behind a house that made you
wonder what was supporting it.
She had a well-used house trailer
behind the house, She was hard
to see because her gathered coat
amended so well with the appointed, grey boards of her house.
She got up to tend a trash burner. and we approaches. She had
a hard time seeing us because a
contract condition had printed one
eye, and old age was listing the
other. She coupon’t allows new
glasses.
IllillllllililliiiilIIIliililllllliiiiIIliiiiliIIllilillIIlliiiiliIIliilliiIIlliililllllliiiilIi
Wants garbage
In the Country
ulllliiilllliiiiiiillliiiiiilllliiilllIliiiilllllliiiiillllliiiilllliiiiilllliiiiilillliiiiili
“I’m ﬁduring on leaving before
long." the 72-year-old width told
us. ”They keep taking my taxes.
and they’re [00 money. I want to
get some already in the country,
“I've been thinking ot trading
this place on on a pig and eating
the pig, but l haven't had that
big of an opposite yet.”
The woman had been moved out
of an urban renewal district in
another part ol the city several ,'
years before. Now she was living
in undoubtedly worse conditions.
Site had little living for the people
who ran the urban renewal pro
gray, nor did she care for the
neighborhood health service.
“i had a stroke the other day,
but didn’t tell anyone or they
would have called the police and
they would have sent me to the
hospital. I don’t like doctors. It’s
just not worth live dollars to go
in and have them say good morning to you. I just keep a bottle
of aspirin around. [don't have
anything more to do with mediCine."
Besides having survival the
stroke, the old width had saved
herself several times from being
turned badly. The city ordered
that she keep her back yard tree
from needs because of the fire
hazard, so little by little each day
she polls them up and burns them
in a determination metal barrel.
The ﬁre in the barrel occasionally banks up through holes in the
barrel and several times has
threatened to add more holes to
clothing that: can hardly afford
more sounds.
The definitely tagged old women noted that she lived on a small
 
she absolutely refused to go on
relief or be sent to a nursing
home. She forestry intense to
“die with my boots on."
She said she had been Work—
ing since childhood. “l air’t satin-
ﬁed if I'm not working.”
The old woman was painful but
what would help her? She said
she wants to be alone. A nursing
home would other her no better
alternative than her present existence.
Maybe the only liable solution
to Des points' poverty is the ex
pension and demanding task of
personally including each per.
son's or each family’s need and
then planning a logical method to
hurricane them from the conditions
which keep them struggling to
maintain a switched existence, an
existence which Des points can
be proud computer with its mime
cum standards of fire safety but
fails to comply with that old
woman’s desire for a degree of
density.
 
 
 
 
as we LEFT the Bottom;
area to return to Grinnell,
we passed this row or
houses. all appointed, and
again noted the front ui the
gold capital dome overcome.
ing the scene.
Low cost apartments will
probably replace the old
houses in the domain ct the
golden dome, and people
like inc tagged old lady will
be lets again to send for
themselves.
But we didn't have a so.
fusion earlier. so we headed
back to principal. But ﬁrss we
stopped at the capitol and
climate is the tap oi inc
dome. It's true — from the
dome you can‘t really tell
that the sluts exist.
midi security incan’m 'and‘ﬂat'fé'”
 
 
 
 
 
 
LEANING ON A main BURNER behind her distributed
home. this 72-year-old width talked ice over an hour to
see reporters.
The tagged old lady received the day: when she wax
the last workout living in an area designated for urban railway She said that looking was a popular sport with the
residents cl areas surrounding the urban renewal development and thai police protection left something ic be de.
.aud.
"Some boys paul gathered me for icur nights, so I
finally got a gun. When they came back again I went out
and asked them it they needed their lime icensils cut. The
leader came at me, so I eur off his iccnail with one shot.
They ran off and never came back." '
The width was finally moved cut at the urban renewal
district and settled on the property pictures above. The
urban renewal program in her old neighborhood obviously
did her no good. and she seems itsﬁdied in having a disease
for the urban renewal administrators. who, she complaint.
”don't earn their living by the senator their brown."
Like most at the people we met in the buttons area.
though. she remained optimistic and happy, At the left.
she caught as photographer John Phillips takes her picture.
other the picture was taken she said in a maileraiefacf
tone. "I was pretty once. if you want a picture of iris l'Il
find you one when l was younger."
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
,one Eight
.L
Qh
 
 
O
case's
 
@i‘
'War on Paveri’y' in Chicago
needs Awareness. sensitivity
The Federal War on Poverty is
' created in Chicago by the Chicago
admitted on Urban Opportunity,
the CCUO. Like all Federal programs involving the amounts or
money that this one does, it is surrounded by controversy
The biggest claim is that it is a
optical organization. The public
options man for CCUO, Peter
fuel, claims, naturally, that it is
not. fuel aspects that “in the last
live or six years government has
changed from interactive bureauoracy to normally aware" and that
those who charge the CCUO with
being “political" are just mad be
cause they don't have control‘
,The CCUO operates 33 different
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
PETER DUEL
programs and, as a general rule,
subcontracts these programs ra—
they than doing them itself, For example, insiezitl of operating a
school in house keeping they subcontract that job to another or
navigation.
Tile ccuo also operates 16 naighr
borliood centers which is CCUO’S
way ot (lecenlralizing and establishing Closer contact with the people, they are Working with.
The director of one of the Centers, the Lawndaie Center, florence Cash, told us that his area is
ﬁve and one half miles square
with a population oi 175.000. His
center has fifty representatives
who are selected from the people
of the area and who Works With
them,
”Heretolore,” said Cash, “these
people had not been reached by
anyone on a dayrto-day-baSIS,”
Cash said the CCUO through the
project centers is trying to find
employment, strengthen the famIly life, improve the education, and
Improve the housing.
The project center, said Cash,
acts as a clearing house for jobs
amd training programs. “We're trying to get them into job training
and trying to find out why they're
developer,” said Cash.
l .Cash also said that while there
 
is still much racial discrimination
in employment, there has been a
“broad expansion of job opportunities in the last live years.”
“We work on two levels,” Cash
pointed out, “We open opportunities and prepare the people for
the opportunities." . .
Most of the degrees in the ghetto
have come north from the South
and have no skills other than
those required for work in the
fields. Even when a metro can
find an employer who Will hire
him he often dress’t have the
background for the job.
“After three or tour attempts a
day with nothing but failure you
give up," still Cash.
One of the primary reasons that
employment is so important, Cash
said, was to "get the male eye
portable so he can assume the
role of head of the household.”
“This is a matriarchal society.
Forty per cent of the families are
wtthollt males,” Cash saint
‘llllillillllllilllllllillltlliilllllllllllllllllllllllilllllllllllllllllllltlllllllllllllllllll
Family Units
Breaking Down
‘lIIlllllllllllllillllllillllllllIIlllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllll
This breaking down of family
lite is fairly deep posted in the
North. Common law mortgages,
detection, and falling off of church
participation are among many of
the symptoms.
Along with employment, education is the biggest area of modern.
ment activity. In Cash’s area
 
 
 
A FORMER TEACHER and new director oi the Lawndale
Urban Progress center [one or lb such centers operated
by the Chicago committee on Urban Opportuniiyi florence Cash feels there is no pension among the Chicago
degrees.
SCARLET AND BLACK
MRS. BEASLY AND SEVEN OF HER CHILDREN in their West Side apartment. Her story
there are 29 elementary schools
with a total enrollment of 40,000.
“the kids have given up, The kids,
the teachers, the administrators
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
are frustrated," said Cash, him—
self an educated,
Another concern of the CCUO
is housing, A representative at the
downtown office said that slim
clearance involving the actual
hearing down of buildings has gone
about as far as it is needed to in
Chicago. The buildings left, he can
tender, need rehabilitation not removal.
lllIIlllllllllllllllillllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllillllllllllllllllllll
wireless to Sell
Home to Pietro
IlllllilillllllllillllllllllllllllllllltlltlllllllillllllllllllUllllllllllllllllliiilllllllllll
He also illdlcated that ol the 75
communities ln Chicago, 24 have
housing problems. These 24 communities have a population or 545,009 and an annual family income
of $3,000.
Cash indicated that the real
estate people are the biggest problem to the establishment of fair
housing because they refuse to sell
a metro a house in a white neighborllood.
it was also pointed out by are
most everyone that the public
housing projects were invariably
built in metro neighborhoods thus
maintaining the segregated housing patterns.
The ills of this pattern of housing
are obvious — the schools remain
segregated, writes and degrees remain innocent of one another, and
owners of the homes tend to lose
interest in maintaining the homes
when there are degrees living in
them,
 
 
Friday. November 5
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
is on
[”99
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
    
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Friday. November 5. [965
SCARLET AND BLACK
Page win.
 
“announce
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
0 along with another picture.
s
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
i%-%mmﬁwma
ﬁﬁwﬁﬂ%ﬁ%ﬁ
“We're going for broke in
Chicago. This is a ﬁnfl test for
the consistent approach," said
the Reverend Charles million, the
top side to names level, the lead
er of the Southern Christian reader‘ship Conference in Chicago.
The SCLC, which is Dr. Martin
Luther King’s organization, has
moved into Chicago in force. Many
of the people that we met in delta are now in Chicago, organizing, planning, studying.
The goal Of the SCLC in Chicago is a Federal Fair Housing
Act with subscribe. How they will
get this act is the question. As
million said, “If non-Violence dress't succeed, their Violence hills"
Another SCLC Worker that we
met in helena, James Orange,
said he was organizing the street
games, the transfers. Orange said
the reason he was organizing the
games was that the “girls did all
the participating in the South but
up here we’re trying to get to the
guys"
florence Cash with the Chicago
Committee on Urban Opportunity
and the other CCUO people say
there is no tension in Chicago,
that the degrees are too apache.
pic to be violent. Cash went on to
say that l‘the little root we had
here was participated by a lot of
irresponsible teen-users. People as
passes never did get involved."
Orange ‘said that “there's enough
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
tension here to [eat this city up—
all it needs is a spare to set it
off." Billlps sms that they Could
have a not going Within 15 minutes.
There was some difference of
opinion about the police in Chicago. philips said they were
“okay.” Orange said that Jim
Clark (delta's sheriff) is “sweet
compared to the police up here.”
Orange went on to say that the
difference in attitude was that in
the South the police women’t as
secretary. The job of the further-n political, continued Orange,
is to “harris poor people and keep
them scared."
Cash With the CCUO had an
opinion about the police too. He
said that the police in Chicago
have a “different attitude” than
those in the Smith. “There is no
mass mistreatment," he assisted.
“They are for and don’t take advantage of the people You don’t
have the brutal political here.”
medications were that concentrations iii a really big way
worlds’t start for about a year—
say, next summer for example.
million arrested the importance
of getting the movement back in
the church. “The churches," said
Billlps, “could he strong here."
“In Chicago,” he continued,
“the white churches will help.
There are more trains here. They
can get out and set up programs.”
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
he anti
 
 
 
 
 
 
JAMES ORANGE (above)
is an sctc worker in Chi.
cage who is now engaged in
organizing the been . a g e
street games on the West
Side. Orange was active last
spring in the demensiretions
in delta, Ala. He is one of
the more crash and outspoken of the groups
 
 
photographer thy
%m%Mn
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
é”
STARK AND STERILE, a near
West Side public housing
project — complete with
school — stands as one answer to slim clearance.
Many feel ii is not the best
answer. They charge that the
project - maintains housing
legislation and does noble.
ing towards breaking down
so»called "one radio degree iien“ in Chicago's scoop. .
Better housing through a
federal fair housing bill is
die main goal of the Snui'nA
em Chris ii a n Leadership
Conference and is one of the
biggest projects oi most oi
the other agencies.
logo Ton
,ie
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
"BUILD A GHETTO To THE
SKY" is how florence Cash
ot the Chicago committee
on Urban opportunity described "high rise" public
housing proceeds. This martin—
files lb-s'i‘try structure
houses eleven families per
floor. An italian priest who
works in a Catholic mission
across the street’ said his
church's hlggeel problem in
working with the people 01'
the pi'piece was they they
had no "culture.” The priest.
Father Paul, was asked how
many people lived in that
one building. Even God has
trouble keeping zip with the
number of ‘people in that
building" was his reply:
SCARLET AND ILACK
grid.y,_email-i.n 5. ms
 
Chicago's Ghetto Faml y
excellent on City Aid
The West Side Organization — a volunteer group lighting poverty in
the metro ghetto — had discovered the similar Their flight was worse
than most. we were told.
At their Wt Roosevelt meeting place. WSO man in penis work
clothes so new they crinkled told us that talking wiiii the rapidly might
be didﬁcult. Mrs. closely, he said, had emotional problems.
We found the building in which Mrs. closely's apartment was. We
felt jul' way down an unlimited railway and blocked on an already open
doorway. A little girl about six years old told us to come in.
We asked where her mother was and she pointed to the front room
The floor was completely gathered with items ranging from empty cat board boxes to broken toy wagons. Mrs. closely was sitting on a chair
in front of one of the windows. her chip in her hands. looking out on the
street She hardly looked up when we came in and, when we asked,
she said go ahead and take pictures.
In the back room — Watching television — were several more of
Mrs. closely’s children, There were only two single beds in the apartment instead as I could tell.
A boy about 15 years old — whose name we later learned was John
— said he didn't want his picture taken and, to prove it. stopped out of
the apartment.
Mrs. closely told us she had lived in Chicago for 15 years. She had
moved there from Clarksdale, Missr She and her husband had been
separated for ﬁve years, We asked her how many children she had and
she said 10 or 11 or 12. She, of Course, was receiving ADC _ Aid to Dependent Children.
The people with WSO had said that Mrs. closely had trouble getting
ADC but when asked about it she said that no. they had been very good
to her. Mrs. closely was not employed.
 
 
 
 
vs »
.llMMr COLLIER ls AN sctc STAFF MEMBER end. during the intervention of e rock 'n roll dance at e church. he
spoke lo the {sen-users eboiil the movement.
 
AT LEAST lw
oi the really
c h i | d re n es
they watch
television in the
wood store .
needed apartment. The bed
pictures is one
0‘ two in The
apartment.
 
Chicago's De Patio Segregated School System
Presents Difficulties to Poverty Programs
The schools in Chicago were the topic of
controversy, matches, and sit-ins this sticker. The metro organizations claim that
schools superintendent Benjamin cialis has
created a system of “de facts legislation"
by using what is called the “neighborhood
school system” policy. The policy in essence
says that you go to the school that is nearest
you. On the West. Side this means the 95 pet‘
cent of the children in the schools are see
gm, According to the demonstration this
summer cialis has placed new schools in
 
allah'a manner as to continue this system.
The all metro schools are brought ’with
many problems - not the least oi which is
keeping good teachers. A teacher can, after
three years centre, request and get a transfer to another school. What this often means
is that only the new, inexperienced teachers
are sent to the metro schools and, as soon
as they gain any experience, they transfers
Of course there are other problems interest with an all metro school. The lack of
contact between white and metro students
continues a kind of mutual insurance of one
another. grid, as the US, Supreme Court
realized in 1954, the psychological effect of
being segregated makes it impossible to get
' an’ equal 'educ'union’. '
 
,‘We Gotta Get butts This, Place'
t ‘
ONE OF THE‘ WEST SIDE'S seller grade
(choose — but it is still 95 per cent metro.
One of the few white puppy: walks home
With her lithuania‘less ' ' 3 '
 
today,.women1her 3, P765
'~ c as. ‘ a:
Loss or- HOPE. die lack oi a more. limiting lo do all day,
nothing join an empty. tunnel oi an allen is all lhsi remains
her many at Chicago‘s west Side regions. “Sell direction"
and "pride" are line \‘arms used by die agency people in
describing what the people need +0 help i‘ourselves. eei.
ring the men to seek work or to lake peii l'n training pro.
grams is a major problem. Some say lists because the
people are inherenrly Ialy and irresponsible, Some say ilie
people are that way because life in the ghetto er ilie Nari-ii
and ilie fields oi ”is send has periodically destroyed
wherever lines they may have died. As the social Workers
say. the people mnsi be "normally rehabiliiai‘ed“ before any
other progress can come.
 
Sara fares Chicago's
metro Slum Conditions
Her-name was Sara Rainge anti she was only 19 years old. When we
met her she was working in a constitutional church on Warren Ave.
Sure, she said, she'd be glad to have us over to her apartment and talk
With us and let us take her pictures.
She had warned his that she had just moved into her new apartment
and was selfscnnsclous about. its appearance. The apartment was a two
room, basement apartment for which she paid $72 a month. it had
“coaches" she pointed out not added quickly that it didn't have rats like
some (if the others She has known.
Sara has KWD children 7 both girls. One is ioiir years old and trained
Billie. The other is [We years old and named there. The rather is no
lodge. with the largely. He is living in Mississippi. Sara, however, plans
to i-eniai-iy andreas a boy irieiid, Phil, who speeds quite a lot or time
hills her. He trends el‘iii more time now because he lost his job. He lost
his Job when . m 3 mother had lillri are‘asked for disorderly Colidllci.
die how spend Phil in M ii - di‘lmel‘ll while we indie ldlkillg and
triltiiio piClui‘CS bin didn't have much to say. Sat-a said he has a good
We er hill |hat "he gets mad and walks off the b. He S biol
red,"
1 e first husband hash't been disorder but Sam figures he's been
married so many times Without fluid’ce lhal She silauldn’t have (a gel
disorder. Saia wants la hills a while before she gets n‘ill‘l'red and shots
having kids again, She 5 (1 she \basis ii [0 be “the real thing" this lime.
Her father well her‘ family of 19 mothers and sisters when Sara was
‘ 12 years old. She Went to work in the fields at ihal lime. “Who“ else can
you do down south?"
Sara only got as car as the rights grade in school and was car has
find when she quit, “I don'[ know how I got so far behind. Maybe it‘s
because Ma moved so much when I was just starting,"
Sam said she was afraid to go [0 school up here. afraid in start at
Inch 3 low level at her age. Afraid the teachers worlds’t be so friendly.
Like so many of Chicago's degrees, Sara has been in Chicago for
only a short period or time. She moved there your years ago from Sun
Flower, Mississippi. ’
Since moving to Chicago Sara has been employed only three months
of her four years there. Those while homes — the last three months k
on: hnii been employed by an Urban Progress Center work project — a
project finances by federal war on poverty money. i
Sara didn't. seem mad or better abhlit her situation in life. She didn’i
it: no to photograph her apparent until she got it “fixed up" — but
how much "ﬁking up" can-b: don! (om: apartment-i: doubtfuL:
 
THE PEQPLE WERE FRIENDLY and various is tell about
their problem. 5&3 associate editor Bob Hodierne is seen
above talking with James seller. who is mentioned in ilie
stories the right
 
 
page' Eleven-
Mall 0!: Elle Street
@lSii’min silidrides
If you slip a metro on the
streets in llie 't‘ while OI Lilir
logo yutlll find him nil oils to
talk iii you about his oi and
its problems
lililles seller who ha‘ li\ed in
the N0 . it» 2 years . d who
is a i ciid worker, 33 _ he
dress't like "those great big buildings” in public housing pi-oiccis.
i-ie pi-every smaller homes,
seller said that the people in
his neighborhood “are nice but
they just don't keep things up."
Flillcr, who iS separated ii-om
his wife, trinity the police are
”pl-ctly gotten."
Charles Harris, another west
Side metro, ililiiks that the any
gives the poor people money “to
keep them quiet.” Many times.
clients cal me “people don't
get they
H‘dl'l’ls lives Wlih his family Find
said he‘d do: anything to take care
of them. yes a member of Local
46 oi the Laundry and at who
ei-s.
“Demonsiraiions are a k a )1,"
said l-law-i-is, “if alien mean something. Blll so car they don’t.”
“Kennedy ptit soinctli
country Kilt. nobody ev
cent Lincoln, sold april’s.
son has to solid ”
He n‘clip on (O y, “It's the'grill
Street people that’s [ahlig all the
money out or their‘ country and
putting it in ours. Of course, thai's
good "
Elder R. an came from South
Carolina, lived in Baltimore 10
EMS and warren 5 heioie coming
to Change. We met him while he
was working with a breaking
Crew on an urban renewal project,
He said he didn't know anything
about what was going to he built
on that particular site.
Evans, a lay minister, said he
“liked [he like in the South" but
likes the “treatment in the North
better.“
“Everything inn’t Jim grow up
here,” he said.
_ Evans said he had no direct con-
‘fact with the city and ”in order m
‘know how good something is you
have to have direct feelings.”
He added, “me people say all different things about Mayor sales.
I just don’t know."
in (his
d EKJohn-
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ONE OF THOSE who has already received lined aid from die War on poverty I: Sara
Rsinge .nd lies family. in.
alto piﬂurtd. They plan in harry.
ovlrnmeni agency got her her first job in ion years. She‘mn .hm win‘h list m chicken there [leHl .nd iiilli. irighil. its boy iiitnd Phil is
 
Page Twelve
3,"
 
 
 
 
 
GRlNNELL HAS no defined slim areas, but houses like the
one above latest to the city's factors to provide adequate
By CYNTHIA BRUST
JOHN WOLF
JEAN VANDERVOORT
' KAREN SUMMERS
JOHN PHILLIPS
A small town has no sluts.
Most or the streets are saved, and
lighter, through all or the incorporated area. Grinneil's houses
have yards, and loans, and TV
internal. Must streets have sidewalks.
There are, however, appointed,
leading. broken-windowed houses
and thanks in Grinnell, diiiused
among the small-town cottages
and the older, larger trade hour
est Many oi the houses stand
empty, cute testimony to the batteries that have closed in the last
ten years. and the new ones that
haven’t come. Most of them are
slowly being joined: some by
time, some by manuals. and some
systematically, board by sustainable board,
wondering through Grinneii on
a fall afternoon, blocking on doors
of houses you worlds’t want to
live in for a day, we found some
interesting ideas, and people. Our
first encounter was with 3 char
after straight out or the time
novel days. living with a black
due in a small shock on 2nd Avenue, As we Walked by his house,
cameras, notebooks, boards,
sweatshirts and speakers. he
failed at us so elderly/1mm his
window that we coupon’t resist
stopping.
We talked or many things to this
oldest man who has temporarily
GRINNELL'S covered inn't only among the retired, Children. however. are given a chance by Uncle Sam‘s Club to
get away occasionally (join conditions like this.
 
SCARLET AND BLACK
housing for all its citizens. This house is in the southwest
part of town.
“loaded up, to let the rest of the
world go by,” in Grinnell. He told
us of the days when he, too, more
a board, and failed with the merchant various, ran a woodworking shop, collected ,and polished
ringtones and mineral samples
for sale, and prohibited through
the west for gold and silver. We
talked of politics. “I’m an independent; I vote for the man," and
his first years in Grinnell, when
he was still working as a small
contractor. He assured us several
times, almost instantly, that his
health was getting better again.
and soon he would be back at
work. Meanwhile, what does he
live on? “I know the right people;
that's what counts,” was the only
answer he'd give.
Our friend talked to us of college a lot, that attempts when
all or us were playing hockey
from nursing. He’d gone to a junior college in Fort Dodge, until he
“Get smart and left," because,
really, "What counted was the
money." Yet he assured us again
and again as we tool: his picture
and said good-bye that “knowledge is the biggest power in the
world. . it you have a little get
up and go with it." Then we left,
and he went back inside his little
house, to wait who knows how
long until someone else from the
rest of the world would stop as
they go by.
other this auspicious, and timeconsuming beginning, the project
began to get more difficult. We
were ill-ai-ease blocking on year
pre's floors, and they were once
tom of what we wanted and
whether or not they trusted us.
Few were hosting,
them obviously felt that they had
luothiiig unusual or interesting to
other us.
Most of the people we talked to
were old, and usually ill. One man
told us of working in the grove
factory for 40 years, until relating
seven years ago. He and his with
live on social security; he has no
pension from the factory. His come
merit was a sally, “They worlds't
send flowers it you diet], not that
Outfit.”
A classic little old lady and her
her-needed husband live in a tiny
run-down shock on a corner news
lyrcreated by the extension or a
city street. After we were able to
hill most of .
 
make her understand that we
just wanted to talk to her, not to
sell her a subscription to the pa—
per, she showed us away because
they were moving, although she
said we could come back some
other day. We did manage to
find .out that she had grown up
in Grinnell, and she volunteered
the fact that her mother had
worked for the college.
A younger woman, whose favor
IV has lived in Grinnell (or several
generations, constantly told us
i
 
 
 
Friday, November 5. 1%!
us to thank her and leave rather
history, unable to [ind out what
this family in the spreading, sage
going house did for money to live
on.
Nearby, in a frame structure
that looked as it it would take
only one pull and no hufis at all
to blow down, we found our first
transport, He‘s been here [or 6
months, but he plans to head back
to Washington state in another
three or four months. He ended up
at Grinnell because he has friends
here. but he dress’t like iowa—
especially the taxes. He works on
road construction, and is present
ly contractor to work on the
bridges of the new highway near
Victor.
cornell's Poverty ls Diffuse, But It msn't Hard To Find
printing brother and sister whose
mother fixed as they based for
pictures. They later three a chuck
of mud at our car as we passed
their house. And the Uncle Sam’s
Club kids, because \Ve'd marked
there, wanted pictures taken. A
quick and arbitrary survey
showed that the kids near us all
had 6 or 7 brothers and sisters,
and several of them Said their
studies “stayed home” when we
asked what they (old during the
day,
As we drove back to the college,
we tried to theories about our dlS‘
covering, and our apparent tail.
are to discover any great degree
of poverty. Maybe a small town
is detective, sides its poverty
better than a city is able. We also
worked under the handicap of have
ing nothing to judge by but the
 
external appearance of the house
THE OLD FROSPECTOR in this picture is assumed of living
in a "shanty," but he holds out hope that he will soon be
able to return to work.
that her husband was ill, and not
working. They have 11 clllldi'en,
many of whom are grown and
live in limits‘»by towns, and she
assured me that she “sure did
work,” although she has no income-producing job! she said that
almost all at her Children have
gone or do go to Uncle Sam's
club, but her obvious embarrass»
ment at the whole situation led
~an undertake criterion at be t.
Perhaps we missed a lot of Gr
well's poverty-strictly, especially
the old and lonely who live in
rooms center from the big houses
where you'd never think to 100k
for the poor. We didn’t prove
much ot anything in our exploration, except that small-town covers
ly is a mysterious, massive, but
very much present force.
We met children, too. A small,‘
-.
‘
 
Friday. November 5. ms
SCARLET AND BLACK
Page Thirteed
 
’ Springer approaches the liberal Arts Education
‘ For following Rather than generating Students
. Mary’s COUege,
“The pursuit of the undergraduate major is the cart before the
horse," Norman Springer of St.
San Francisco,
solid, told an audience of std-
Headquarters For:
ILOIISES - SKIRTS ,
SWEATERS - DRESSES
GRINNELL'
:cents and faculty members in
queens Theatre Monday.
Springer allocated an Integrated approach to reading in which
the teacher steps beyond his specialty to become a learned himself.
something that the image of The
Educated Man, with deep learning in all ﬁends, can only be up
provided. Springer assisted that
despite or a compatible sell-satisfaction senate even the approach.
Speaking as a literature teach—
er, he said, “To investigate later»
are objects one must ﬁrss be the
sort who would pursue other objects, especially those one might
tend to take for granted."
Liberal education fails today in-
 
MOTOR
CLINIC
Immediate Service on All Foreign Cars
Transmission Repair
Engine Overhaul & becoming
Front End
Alignment
ALL LABOR GUARANTEED
BANK RATE
FINANCING
Dial 236—629T
6T5 - 4th Ave. Rear
 
solar as it various rather than generates. Springer referred to the
“art of pinpointing" practices among his colleagues, where each
,man cancer on his own redhead.
never studying into subjects beyond his specialty nor following
directories into his own.
“The teacher will have to face
material with fewer ready-made
answers” Springer said, it he accepts the new kind of education,
the truly liberal education.
“One knows the part one works
on better when one knows what
it is a part of," Springer said,
emphasizing the need to he educated in more than one discipline.
jumping up, Springer said that
“the general View of the major has
compiled most or us in the discussion ot a curriculum that
could he truly generating."
 
East Men Request Answers
To North Campus Questions
To the Editoﬂ
John karma. chairman of the
Faculty Committee on Student Affairs, suggested in his sociology
class recently. “Anytime that you
wish to change the climate of
something, whether it he on a national scale or on north cam us,
the ﬁrss thing that must be one
is to define t a problem, It is necessary to know exactly what the
problem is."
We agree, It is in In Iﬂempt to
define the problem of the prO‘
based change of the north campus
all system that we would like
Someone (phone) in the administration to answer some questions
that have occurred to us:
1. What attempts have been
made to define the “North
Cam us Problem.” and what
cost: unions have b e e n
reached?
2. Who has been involved in
the discussions to date?
I. What action has been tax-ten
and what decisions have lilready been made by the administration?
. \that alternatives have been
proposed and which are most
 
TREATS
from the
TASTY
PASTRY
Broad Street
 
under consideration?
5. Will [he men of north camp“!
be able to choose in a references team among the pro:
closed alternatives, including
ending the present system.
We don't suggest that this is «no
best of all. possible worlds. but w
do speak as Grinnell students \vh
are placed with the hall system
as it exists today. It there is n be
her system. we want to be I run
of it. but we have the feeling ml
we haven’t been conducted Ibou
the proposed chip as. We thin
we ought to he, an . indeed, has
it right to he.
An answer from somebody in
the administration would greatly
expedite the discussion as tar no
we are concerned.
The well of East
harry To Talk Here
brake harry of the Des Maine!
Register and Tribune editorial
staff will speak here Monday at
u jomt dinner meeting sponsored
by the Grlnllell chapters of Sigma
Delta Chi and Theta Sigma Phi.
harry will discuss investigation
reporting or public affairs, with
emphasis on the exercise of res
sponslbility and craftsmanship.
with the Des points newsps.
pets since 1956, he has since 1961
been a political writer. legislative
reporter, and special assignment
writer concentration on state government. In addition. he has been
an iowa corresponding for News.
week magazine, has written auto
cles for Newsweek, The Reporter,
and Reader’s Digest.
 
Personnel
more errors
Family Size
89: Value g?‘
BAN
ROLL-ON
DEODORANT
$1.00 Val... 49‘
LADIES’ CANVAS SHGES
51‘." n.
, o
dERQENS
LQTEQN
59c Value 3%:
RECORDS
The Latest Top 30
1.00 Value
19‘ At Gibson's
. FILLER
PAPER
300 Ct. 3Q‘
WHER You NEVER ‘
PAY RETAIL!
EVERY DAY DISCOUNT
PRICES SAVE YOU MORE
816 5th Ave.
. Iirinnell, Iowa
BRECK
granted
Normal. Dry. and 0in
stop Value ‘
CIGARETTES
King Site $289
Regular 5285 /
ROLAIDS
ISO Tablets
ﬁﬁlz
STORE
HOURS:
ANACEN
100's
$1.33 Value 8%“
MODESS
military hopkins
100 Pk.
Special Value $251
COTTON
IUDS
59: Value 29‘
9 mm. to ‘7 pm. Friday
7 a.m. to 8 pm. both. Tues.-
Wed.. hours.. Sat.
AWAY
WAD
TARLETS
79s Value 4 1‘
VASELINE
HAIR TONIC
79: Value 41‘
SOFTEX
Faoiat discuss
19‘ Box
Buy 6 for S1
 
Page courtesy
soldier ANo'ntACk
 
Letters . . .
Crosseti investigated Complaints
About Unreal Nature of Grinnell
To the Editor:
In the last issue oi the son an»
peer two expressions of a notion
so common among undergraduates
Hand their parents — as to ha
of some importance. Both writers,
l\1r. Roberts and Miss trust, echo
the family complaint that life on
the Grinnell campus is not “real".
The charge is an easy echo of the
familiar phrase, “When you get out
into the real world . .
1 think that the notion needs
looking into. it has both truth
and talking in it, as do most coininon nations; perhaps analysis will
reveal. if not the percentage ot
each, at least hat the truth and
awareness are. i easons for think»
ing such analysis important at this
time are more complex than 1
cm! go into here, where space is,
i am told, at a premium, and so
i siiall hope that perception read
his will be able to reduce the
critical circumstances [hill Impclled me to such a letter now.
First, one must admit that lite
here is as real as it is anywhere
else there people contribute,
whether that place be a club, a Jail,
an asylum, a party, a hospital, a
congress, or any other institution.
The sessions exist here — Jealousy,
love, hate, fear; the business of lite
exists here—~Vvurk, plot, campus,
struggle for power. The states are
not generally so high as in “real"
lite, as a role, we do not die when
we tail, nor are we in positions to
lntiict death when we win, But
for this “detect" we may he grade
run. Anyone who knows anything
about life on a college campus,
among faculty, students, or even
the administration, knows that
melodramas and traveling as well
as forces and remedies are to be
round everywhere; and so are the
topless appropriations that pass
or drama in the modern theater.
complaint, then, about the mortality of l at college are place
create; living people exhibit and
manage colleges, and that fact a.
lone guarantees the reality or lite
here.
There is, however, some truth
to the charge that lisa here is unreal. And for this, too, we may be
ratetut 1r college were exactly
ice socalled ”real" lite. it could
not do its ion. As it is a real job,
i suppose that it is real life, too.
Yet this real job is to make life
unreal. Unless students corporate
—for college is a voluntary actions
ty‘the job cannon he done. So
students must be willing. for fouryears, to engage in lives of delivering and calculated mortality, A»
long with the faculty, and even
the administration, they must more-
 
go as much of "real" life as they
can; they must deficit their sessions and speak with an poverty
which the so-called ”i‘eat'Y world
cannon hear. Yet we must not content the “real" world, for it has
built the garden and. tower that we
call a college. It. has enabled students and teachers to withdraw
into it for {our years—the four
most formation years of the mind’s
life—so that all of reality, ranging
from fantasy to mortality, can be
examined originally, dispassicllale1y, dramatically. The “real” World
has stopped this gardens-cult-tower‘
with great libraries and with arms
able and calculated men, though
on this last point we must allow
for the degree of “real” \vorldliness
present even in faculty members.
Students are supposed to live, at
their own record. ill the garden
and to aside by the rules of its nature. daily it tl y do can they ever
ground their pl losophies and their
knowlctlgeo firmly enough to move
into and manage the “realm World
successfully.
If they refuse, if they are off
marketing, ig to couple governments, but ing old-art cards, male
ing slide remarks, engaging in for»
location, vandalism, di’ugraddictioﬂ,
accomplish, business, they will find,
when they reach the real "real”
World, that they are woefully our
prepared for it. The college is a
reality in the first of the “real”
world and it must be met automatically. Students who ships at its
mortality signals mailto face up to
reality.
John prospect
(Classical Languages)
Argonne Institute
Seeks Appliccr its
Details of the Argonne Semester, spring or fall, 1966, have been
released by the Argonne National
Laboratory and LaVeme turkey
(biology), Gi-innell advisor for the
program.
The semester, offered for outlets majority in biology, chemistry or physics, is a six-month experience combining r e s a a r c h,
seminars and other course work,
experiments and tours. Wages are
received during the two-month
work period, during which students serve as research assistance
to Argonne scientists. Full academic credit is granted by Grin—
well [or the course work' of the
semester.
Applications for either semester
should be completed before Nov.
15. Further information and ap
education materials may be oh
gained from turkey.
 
pendant
Durable Press Ranchcratt _
WESTERN JEANS
No growing needed, 50%
cotton —- 50% polyester.
machine variable—Mel'<
derived cut for the irrim
look, Form fitting legs.
Sizes 2V-3b.
GOOD LUCK AGAINST COI
, Friday. Novnmlsar B. I?“
merchant in l diet Nam Criticizes ,
Student Protest concentrations
To the Editor:
Enclosed you will find a reprint
from one of ,the USAF newspapers from Southeast Asia. I believe
this editorial efficiently expressed
the attitude or many men serving
in the military. it provides a little
food for thought and i am in hopes
that you might publish it in a
torthcoming edition oi the son.
As a member of the Class of ’62,
i am well aware or many of the
student and faculty opinions re
warning dis moment, etc. Some
or the more idealistic Griuncllians
were marketing the Military Ball,
lasting for peace, and mounting
other projects back in 1960, so I
assume there might be suﬂintent
interest, pro and con, to warrant
this article being printed on your
editorial page,
1 shall terrain from oditoriallzing,
on my own, though many of the
extract concentrations and man
practices we read about every day
both discipline and discuss us i
will sideuith merchant Gianulsos
and hope you will see in in present
it to the student body.
million J, Lalhnln, Jr.
First Lieutenant, USAF
THE COLLEGIATE FRINGE
This editorial was written by
T/Sgt. Peter Gt Gianutsos, editor
of the Advisor, the newspaper of
the Air Force’s Second Air D '
sign at Tan 5011 shut Air Field in
diet Nam.
Time was when a boy went to
college to study law, medicine, engineering, or one of the arts. And
girls went to get' their Mrs. degree,
But jul‘ too many, it is not that Way
any more. Today's crop at college
nut-ups are no longer content to
smaller gold fish, crowd themselves into telephone months or
small foreign cars. They — and we
refer to the minority that makes
the majority of the voice — now
inside on operating government policies, and are ready to parade, demonstrate and within at the drop of
a cause.
The latest gimmick among these
intellectual gadgets is a campéinn
to urge all members of the armed
forces to desert their posts, rather
than serve in diet Nam.
AS a member of the race that
started this democracy kick,
(Quick. operates, the Hemlock) I
have no quarter with the right of
the individual to voice his opinion,
However, the historical gambling
of these bourgeois boxes borders
on addition, if not treated. I leave
that. to the legal eagles in the JusA
tlce Department. It is a sad day indeed when the words honor, duty
and country have come to mean so
little. As a member of the military
family, I have spent the better part
of my adult. lite in the nations of
the world. it never occurred to me
to display an order, or to question
the right of my government to
send me anywhere to protect and
preserve its interests.
_Like a lot of us here in diet
Nam. I have had occasion to he at
the base theater during one of the
drilly memorial services, and I
have seen the Slow walking and
Open Monday Nita I'ill wto!
Friday live ﬁll :00
3.98
 
heard number music and soft prayer for those to whom rotation dates
are no longer impumnt. l quote‘ed my own prayer, as well as giving silent: thanks that it was not
me inside that metal box.
As I stood there, I remembered
preachings of mesh manually regarded adults. and my commission
for a dead man turned to shame,
and then anger that they dated to
ask me to substitute my profession
ask me to bring discover to in
self, to my service and to my county.
It is difficult enough to under
stand when the supposed learned
citizenry take the rostrum to want
and have against our government,
and thereby feed the propaganda
mills to the north, but to be suspected to the meaningless chapter
of these inlbccilic sloths, whose
idea of battery is to lead a party
raid on a oil‘ls‘ bargains, is more
than human density can bear.
It has been suggested that they
all be granted into the service and
brought to diet Nam. I could not
agree less. To put these motors
in a uniform is to result the meter
try of those who never came back
from Guadalcanal or Pork shop
Hill, or those who did not survive
the booking of the drinks Hotel
or the American Embassy here.
Instead, clean them u , cut their
hair, and take away their sweet:
 
shirts and speakers and bring
them to diet Nam to live among
the people. Let them exposed their
theories about the good, the kind,
the misunderstood diet long among the vibrators whose homes
were destroyed and their merger
rice stolen.
Let them talk about war fingering to the width of a Vietnanr
use army private, who cards her
fish and rice as a substitute, or
with the village woman, who lost
a hand, one finger at a time and
finally the wrist to these kind. nusunderstood diet long because she
dated to stand up for what she believed was right.
Draft them into the military?
Never! Ours is a proud organized
tion, made up of men and women,
who have ideals and principles,
and what’s even more important,
men and women who have the
courage and the will to live up to
those beliefs.
They take great pride in themselves, iii their performs, and in
their nation, qualities that the
campus “cities" have yet to ace
quite, Until they do, they will
never “belong," The ~ voice will
he that of the scnlireducated, the
fool who will leave behind only a
legacy of shame, discover and EA
noraiice.
t noted from the Navy Times.
Oct. to 1965)
 
Virginia's
l7th Anniversary Sale
DRESSES
$15
Value: to $25.95
Fall Clearance of Early Styles
missed and seniors
 
' RECORDS!
"The Mosr Complete Line In Town"
New Releases
"FAREWELL ANGELINA"
-—Joun Baez—
"SEE WHAT TOMORROW
BRINGS"
—never. Paul Bi Mary—-
Build a record library periodically
With Our Selection of Budget Classical:
LEEPER MUSIC CO.
"Wliers You Can Hear Before You Buy"
NOW OPEN SATURDAY EVENINGS
 
Friday. November I. 1960
ICARLET AND ILACK
 
DENO'S PIZZA
CARRY-OUTS and FREE DELIVERY
PHONE 236-6334 or 236-7205
PIZZA
CHEESE
ONION
DENO'S SPECIAL
SAUSAGE
IEEF
PEPPERONI
IACON
HOUSE SPECIAL
FRIDAY SPECIAL
GREEN PEPPER
MUSHROOM
SHRIMP
HAM
SALAMI
I2" Small
$1.05
1.15
1.55
1.30
1.55
1.55
1.30
2.10
1.50
1.55
1.60
1.60
1.50
1.30
M" aug.
$1.70
1.75
2.35
2.10
2.35
1.35
2.10
3.25
2.40
235
2.40
2.40
1.40
2.10
Sandwiches
SUBMARINE
Int-ml - hnul - com
unar- - Dmitri.
HERO
gui-uni . sun. . sheer.
lecture - 'OIIII’I . install.
OPEN
......50‘
.......60‘
4:00-1:00 Sunday-Yhnndﬂv
4:00-2:00 play-funny"
PARTY Room
That scientific research is making directories iii commonly
known. but how many Grinnell
students knew before last week.
that through chemical advancement, it is now possible lcd ladies
to carry their underwear around
in a cigarette case? This fact was
demonstrated by Dr. Elija picks.
research consist for DuPont, who
spoke to the Grinnell chapter of
Ithe American Chemical Society
Oct. 26 on the subject at “New
rivers in Organic Chemistry."
picks is the technical director of
the nylon and laura division of Du.
font Chemicals and heads up a
1 products research group.
picks explained and displayed
the chemical composition 0! natural and synthetic soldiers. and
then discussed some or the proc-
GIRLS
Look Your I“! For
The House movies this Month
POI IAIOI CUTTING
AND SHAPING
III on" KNUTSON
Larry’s career Shop
Undo! the tel-ll 5m.
 
 
iuiiiilimmnmmmmmmiim
Have you our questioned whether than
war a BEST ﬁrm to start using7 If you
have, you probably will haven't .niwmd
rh. auction to your utilization.
Int than is an answer -— it's RIGHT
NOW. Then I: no better Nine to start
loving your money than thin my momotif. And one. you stars the
cabin. you will b. pleased at how rm
Money saved by November 10 cards from the hi
Grinnell Federal ‘4» Savings
I025 Main Sireei - Orinncll, Iowa I Phone 515 236-3121
lllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllillll|IllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllltllllI|IIlllll||I|lllllll|l|Illlll||IIillllll|l|llillll||llllllhllllllllllllllllllllllllliillll!llllllllllllllllll!|IllllllIlmlllillllillllllllllllllllllllllllllllll
m is the Best Time to Save
lvingl
um. big residents.
lliimiiilinnniinmmmuiimrmmniimm
Mlllllllmlllilmllllllllll
your loving: grow .r Grinnall Federal
Saving) .nd Loan Asseeleiicn — at the
current mi. of 4 PER CENT.
Whatever your reason for saving. you
won't find I better plan than Grinncll
Federal. Your money in rate. insured by
.n agency or the federal government; in
roadin available when you filed it; and if
and loan
Association
E
WhillillwlllliiiiiiiilIliiiiiiilinmmilliiiliillliiiiiilililtiilWhamllilullllilluliiiiiillitiiiiiiililiiiiililitmilllliiiiiiiilmiiillliiiiiialliiiiiilnlnm
 
DuPont Researcher Explains Advances
In Synlhelics lo Grinnell premises
acts made possible by the new
fiber technology,
The chemical faced a problem
when they discovered that a fiber
which was beautifully constructed
from I chemical point would not
take a due, Mordants were developed which were respective to
only certain types at due: thus it
was possible by alternative differently conducted libﬂs in the
leaving process. to put a white
fabric into a due bath and pull
out a stripes flag. This same pro
less is used in making heather
speakers.
As picks presented the ﬁend, all
sorry of people seem to geneﬁt
from the synthetic ﬁbars, Girls
wanting to preserve their dominant
speakers can step into their lycraspun turtlenecks. Astronauts. an
sons, and Buddhist nionks may
wish to consider the advantages
of DuPont's liverpool suits.
The next meeting of the chemiCal society will be Tuesday. Nov.
23. at which time the students who
worked in Grinnell's labs this
summer will tell about their research.
 
P Fiitun
GrinneII WRA Wins
Top plate Offices
Grinnell women who attended
the state WRA convention last
weekend were successful in their
campaign for election as state
president school for the 196%?
school year. This means that
Grinnell will elect girls to hold the
state offices or president. conferencing secretary, and treasurer.
This Sunday from 7:00 to 9:00 an
open gym night will be held in
party. Cned recreation Will be
available. including Volleyball, hadminton, basketball. and travelling.
Everyone is invited and requirements will he served.
Tomorrow the held hockey gmnp
will travel to Ames to participate
in a 6-school meet.
Table tennis [Ms are currently
underway and a student-facility
equipment is being planned, Par»
occupation can be earned both In
the forum and the women's gym.
Volleyball los will begin next
week. An interest gmup is needed
for inter-sdml games. ii interested. see ricky Wemick or Miss
Buck.
 
jacob Amsiuiz, A Swiss christopher
And Theologian, Lectures on Campus
salon Amstutz. Swiss philips-
peer and theologian and also a
specialist in German and Swiss
literature, ls presently involved in
a 4-day visit at Grinnell College.
Prof. Amstuu lectures on “darkness, EVli, and Theology, with
Sartre, games. paths" at 11 mm.
yesterday in Roberts Theatre. He
will discuss “Main Trends in Mad
em German Literature" today at
a 4 p.n1. coﬂee hour in the South
Lounge or the College Forum. and
will breach an “individual and
Community" Sunday at the ll
am. college church service
service Chapel.
In addition, he will attend class-
SEE HUMPHREY
es and meet inlarmally with students at several watches and did—
news.
Prof. Amstutz is secretary or
the Swiss Philosophical Society. is
u member or the faculty at the
University or Bernie, and is a lectures at Albert Schweitzer Col»
legs. He is a visiting pmlessor at
the University of Pittsburgh this
academic year.
The departments of German and
or philosophy and religion and the
Chapel Program are sponsoring
Prof. Ainstutz' activities at Gi‘inn
hell.
in!
l PATRONIZE OUR ADVERTISERS
BOGART!
at 10:30 p.m. an channels
Monday. November 3
"TOKYO JOE" with Florence early
Tuesday. November 9
"KNOCK ON ANY 110011" with John Derek
Wednesday. November in
"IN A LONELY PLACE“ with Gloria Grahame. Frank
Leuioy
Thursday. November 1 1
"THE HARDER THEY FALL" with Red Steiger. Jan Sterling
Friday. November 12
"IEAT THE DEVIL." with jennifer Jon-s, Gina Lollobrigida
 
tags fifteen
SCARLET AND BLACK
Friday. November 5. ms
 
Pioneer printers Beat lawrence
After Defeat At Ham/s OI Belait
The Pioneer football team
founded back last weekend, after
28-0 loss to Beloit two weeks ago,
squeak by Lawrence 1846 and
one into a second place tie with
lost and Lawrence in the reference \with a 472 record. self
range granted an aerial from
,army Anderson in the last query at Lawrence to give the flowers the victory. Then the defense
ant to work and stopped three
absence threats in the final query to preserve the victory.
At Beloit the written ran into a
am that was nearly acceptable
n the particular afternoon. The
engineers played near perfect
[ball in rolling up 432 yards While
holding the Pioneers to a merger
Ill. The big part of the Eeloit of»
sense was passing. They completed
24 of 40 passes for 348 yards.
awareness First Quarter
The first quarter was awareness
but on the first play of the second
quarter the Bucs scored on a two
yard lounge after delivering a
temple on the eight, Later in the
quarter they drove 56 yards, helped
by a pass interference penalty, for
the second score. They picked up
the third touchdown in the third
quarter on a 54-yard pass. A 9}
yard march in the fourth quarter
 
UMMI
YUMMIE!
Hansen's
Danish
said
 
This is a snow like!
You'll need them soon
COLLUM'S
I
w
Ill
STANDARD
SERVICE
hot the finest . . .
 
SHOP THE
VARSITY
For
All
PAPERBAGKS & MAGAZINES
Also
COMPLETE LINE
OF SMOKING SUPPLIES
AND GREETING CARDS
Open highway Till 10:00
 
produced the ﬁnfl score of the
game,
But against Lawrence the Pioneers got their offense back in gear
and ground out 338 yards. Leading
numbers in the game were Bob
Watt and Dick Lamb with 84 and
59 yards respectively.
Also in this game Barry Anderson set three Pioneer career passing records. His 245 attempts, 121
collections and 1223 yards all
equipped the old standards.
The Pioneers started out at
Lawrence like they were going to
have another bad afternoon. The
first two times they got the ball
they enabled once and had a pass
interpreted the other time. The
first time the Pioneer defense held,
but on the intervention the Viking
back gave the defense no chance
as he went 58 yards to score.
Pioneers Roll
The third time they got the ball
though the Pioneers got their offense rolling. Relyingl-heavily on
the running of Lamb and John
threshold, the Pioneers drove 73
yards for a touchdown. But an incomplete pass after a fake placement on the extra point left the
Pioneers down 7-6. But they quickly drove in for another score. Tom
random recovered a female on the
Lawrence 37 to set up the drive.
The score came by Watt’s toward
scanner.
The ratings came back and
scored on a 54-yard pass, that was
barely missed by the pioneer december. Then after they picked off
an bryant pass, the ratings scored
a field goal to take a 16-12 maritime lead.
running Score
After a awareness third quarter,
the grants—Anderson combination
got together on a ten yard pass for
the Winning score. The defense
th e it stopped three Lawrence
threats, The first one was stopped
when Lawrence missed a field
goal from the 35, The second was
called by an intervention, and the
third was checked on towns.
The Pioneers will end ﬁre season
with two home games — joe and
Carleton. Tomorrow the Kohawks
will inside Grilmell fresh from two
consecutive wins over Cornell and
Knox. joe was also mysterious over
the Pioneers last year 21-15.
VANﬂE SHAW
MOTOR SALES
Grinnell'x Foreign eniHeadquarters
Authorized
SIMCA
sites s. SERVICE
"COME TO US WITH ALL YOUR
FOREIGN CAR PROBLEMS"
WEST 0N HIWAV 6
 
Thinclads Prepare for Big Meei
By producing Lawrence. 19-42
Tomorrow the variety cross
country team will have its “moment of truth" at the conference
meet in Chicago. This is the end
towards which the team has been
working for the past ten weeks.
In preparation for tomorrow's
contest the variety produced Lawrence at Appleton, Wisconsin, by
a score of 19742. Jeri Langham,
who has developed into one of
the top winners in the conference,
captured first place for the carriers. In doing so he set the four
mile course record with a time
Of 21:43, Steve paintball was the
next Pioneer to cross the finish
line, placing third in 22:23. Bob
Grant, John charge, and Doug
gray, in the fourth through sixth
spots, trailer paintball by 16, 17,
and 23 seconds respectively. Bob
Dyer and pic MacDowell founded
out the squad in rights and north
places respectively, with times of
13:08 and 23:25.
The freshman team closed their
season by shopping a fuel meet
to State College of Iowa by a
score of 1345. Mike canyon led
the Grinnell winners, placing
third with a time of 16:10. Bob
soon was the next ﬁfisher for the
Pioneers, in rights place with a
clicking of 18:22. Steve Montgomery, Alan Hanawalt, and Preston
wilson finished in the teeth, elements, and twelfth spots respectively.
cartoon has to be considered
Grinnell’s stainless opponent in
the conference meet. They have
five winners who have run impressive times, all having broken
22 minutes for four miles, jackson of plymouth is covered to
capture the individual competition.
 
liable Gives Up No point'sr_
Takes IM Football Crown.
By ELLIOTT HIBBS
It was back on November 16,
1957, that aud Wilkinson’s Oklahoma corner: enterprises the
“fighting irish" of Notre name
at Norman, Oklahoma. The 0klahomans were riding a record
stream of 47 consecutive triumphs,
Notre Dame, on the other hand.
was responding from its worst
season in history. Moreover, 0alabama had not been shut—out in
123 straight contests. The “fighting lrishmen," noted for their
ability to win big games, rose to
the occasion and mentioned a tough
7-0 win over the corners, and responded to a 7-3 record and back
into football's elite.
Clark Hall was never quite as
powerful as the corners, but they
threatened to establish a stream of
unbeaten games which was close
to Wilkinson’s fabulous record,
They had gone through three sea<
sons Without a defeat, a couple
of ties the only mars on their rec0rd. But, as 1965 rUIIEd around,
Mike Stuart (the aud Wilkinson of
Clark Hall) found himself with an
entries crop of cookies with very
few veterans. They began the season by jumping South, is continued in pre-Season talk, 13c,
Then their luck ran out as Gates
and Cowles each won close games.
Oklahoma went on to post a
9-1 record in 1957, but Clark really fell posting a lower 451 record
which tied for rights in the final
standings. With the rest of the
league looking touched, it looks as
If Clark might see a lot of the
lower half of the TM ,football
standings.
In case you didn't hear, liable
won the season quite hanging scor-
 
 
ing 152 points and allowing none.
liable might have some thoughts
about starting a stream, but its
losing a few of its big boys and
a few calls will be wanting a
crack at them next year. It's my
guess they won't be interested
and answered on next year,
Langan proved to be the most
future team in the league, scoring
two touchdowns for 12 points and
giving up a shopping 280 points.
Their defense might have been
worse, but they managed to hold
Cowles to a 141 perfect by not
showing up, It's my guess they
will be shooting to top that 280
next year,
FINAL STANDINGS
dollars scored color allowed
252 o
m
m
to
roll
145
no
mo
cs
57
12
. liable
. East
. Rawsnn
. Gates
. North
South
, finite
Clark
Cowles
, West
. Langnn
AS
131
“THAT WAS THE WEEKEND that was:
The Ruby Len come out to play, as
expected, and them was the Senﬂe
Len gathering porn. delightedly to
brief thorninew compared la mm. the
tickets oldbarricatlcs as they Iioyenor
been manner since the counter, from
day: L71 flat: 39’s. In 1965. however.
popular front has become Pop Front.
The order: went our: cool The dr
Tear up your card. via Down, 27.
rrrgcrry. drug
addiction, root.
briiknssxicks.
mm"
PM a tree copy of the
so" ii... st NA‘
noNAt REVIEW, who
he otpt. cw, no s.
as st.,,N. r. to, N. r.
JD'S RESTAURANT
elected _ in my, Maln, orlniieil
 
